Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-622
Unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the first degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the first degree if such person sells or has in his or her possession or under his or her control with the intent to deliver, circulate, or sell two or more financial transaction devices which he or she knows or reasonably should know to be lost, stolen, forged, altered, counterfeited, or delivered under a mistake as to the identity or address of the account holder.

(2) Any person committing the offense of unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the first degree shall be guilty of a Class IIA felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 38.

Under section 28-621 and this section, an employee is deemed to have "stolen" credit card statements if he or she physically removes such statements from his or her employer's premises with the knowledge that such statements will be used unlawfully and without the employer's authorization or knowledge. State v. Rhea, 262 Neb. 886, 636 N.W.2d 364 (2001).